Mississippi, session 2026, HB1674.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 73-21-151, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 73-21-151.  Sections 73-21-151 through 73-21-163 shall be known as the "Pharmacy Benefit Prompt Pay Act." SECTION 2.  Section 73-21-153, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 73-21-153.  For purposes of Sections 73-21-151 through 73-21-163, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Board" means the State Board of Pharmacy. (b)  "Commissioner" means the Mississippi Commissioner of Insurance. (c)  "Day" means a calendar day, unless otherwise defined or limited. (d)  "Electronic claim" means the transmission of data for purposes of payment of covered prescription drugs, other products and supplies, and pharmacist services in an electronic data format specified by a pharmacy benefit manager and approved by the department. (e)  "Electronic adjudication" means the process of electronically receiving, reviewing and accepting or rejecting an electronic claim. (f)  "Enrollee" means an individual who has been enrolled in a pharmacy benefit management plan. (g)  "Health insurance plan" means benefits consisting of prescription drugs, other products and supplies, and pharmacist services provided directly, through insurance or reimbursement, or otherwise and including items and services paid for as prescription drugs, other products and supplies, and pharmacist services under any hospital or medical service policy or certificate, hospital or medical service plan contract, preferred provider organization agreement, or health maintenance organization contract offered by a health insurance issuer. (h)  "Pharmacy benefit manager" shall have the same definition as provided in Section 73-21-179. However, through June 30, 2014, the term "pharmacy benefit manager" shall not include an insurance company that provides an integrated health benefit plan and that does not separately contract for pharmacy benefit management services.  From and after July 1, 2014, the term "pharmacy benefit manager" shall not include an insurance company unless the insurance company is providing services as a pharmacy benefit manager as defined in Section 73-21-179, in which case the insurance company shall be subject to Sections 73-21-151 through 73-21-159 only for those pharmacy benefit manager services.  In addition, the term "pharmacy benefit manager" shall not include the pharmacy benefit manager of the Mississippi State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan or the Mississippi Division of Medicaid or its contractors when performing pharmacy benefit manager services for the Division of Medicaid. (i)  "Pharmacy benefit manager affiliate" means a pharmacy or pharmacist that directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, owns or controls, is owned or controlled by, or is under common ownership or control with a pharmacy benefit manager. (j)  "Pharmacy benefit management plan" shall have the same definition as provided in Section 73-21-179. (k)  "Pharmacist," "pharmacist services" and "pharmacy" or "pharmacies" shall have the same definitions as provided in Section 73-21-73. (l)  "Uniform claim form" means a form prescribed by rule by the State Board of Pharmacy; however, for purposes of Sections 73-21-151 through 73-21-159, the board shall adopt the same definition or rule where the State Department of Insurance has adopted a rule covering the same type of claim.  The board may modify the terminology of the rule and form when necessary to comply with the provisions of Sections 73-21-151 through 73-21-159. (m)  "Plan sponsors" means the employers, insurance companies, unions and health maintenance organizations that contract with a pharmacy benefit manager for delivery of prescription services. SECTION 3.  Section 73-21-156, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 73-21-156.  (1) As used in this section, the following terms shall be defined as provided in this subsection: (a) "Maximum allowable cost list" means a listing of drugs or other methodology used by a pharmacy benefit manager, directly or indirectly, setting the maximum allowable payment to a pharmacy or pharmacist for a generic drug, brand-name drug, biologic product or other prescription drug.  The term "maximum allowable cost list" includes without limitation: (i)  Average acquisition cost, including national average drug acquisition cost; (ii)  Average manufacturer price; (iii)  Average wholesale price; (iv)  Brand effective rate or generic effective rate; (v)  Discount indexing; (vi)  Federal upper limits; (vii)  Wholesale acquisition cost; and (viii)  Any other term that a pharmacy benefit manager or a health care insurer may use to establish reimbursement rates to a pharmacist or pharmacy for pharmacist services. (b) "Pharmacy acquisition cost" means the amount that a pharmaceutical wholesaler charges for a pharmaceutical product as listed on the pharmacy's billing invoice. (2)  Before a pharmacy benefit manager places or continues a particular drug on a maximum allowable cost list, the drug: (a)  If the drug is a generic equivalent drug product as defined in 73-21-73, shall be listed as therapeutically equivalent and pharmaceutically equivalent "A" or "B" rated in the United States Food and Drug Administration's most recent version of the "Orange Book" or "Green Book" or have an NR or NA rating by Medi-Span, Gold Standard, or a similar rating by a nationally recognized reference approved by the board; (b)  Shall be available for purchase by each pharmacy in the state from national or regional wholesalers operating in Mississippi; and (c)  Shall not be obsolete. (3)  A pharmacy benefit manager shall: (a)  Provide access to its maximum allowable cost list to each pharmacy subject to the maximum allowable cost list; (b)  Update its maximum allowable cost list on a timely basis, but in no event longer than three (3) calendar days; and (c)  Provide a process for each pharmacy subject to the maximum allowable cost list to receive prompt notification of an update to the maximum allowable cost list. (4)  A pharmacy benefit manager shall: (a)  Provide a reasonable administrative appeal procedure to allow pharmacies to challenge a maximum allowable cost list and reimbursements made under a maximum allowable cost list for a specific drug or drugs as: (i)  Not meeting the requirements of this section; or (ii)  Being below the pharmacy acquisition cost. (b)  The reasonable administrative appeal procedure shall include the following: (i)  A dedicated telephone number, email address and website for the purpose of submitting administrative appeals; (ii)  The ability to submit an administrative appeal directly to the pharmacy benefit manager regarding the pharmacy benefit management plan or through a pharmacy service administrative organization; and (iii)  A period of less than thirty (30) business days to file an administrative appeal. (c)  The pharmacy benefit manager shall respond to the challenge under paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) within thirty (30) business days after receipt of the challenge. (d)  If a challenge is made under paragraph (a) of this subsection (4), the pharmacy benefit manager shall within thirty (30) business days after receipt of the challenge either: (i)  If the appeal is upheld: 1.  Make the change in the maximum allowable cost list payment to at least the pharmacy acquisition cost; 2.  Permit the challenging pharmacy or pharmacist to reverse and rebill the claim in question; 3.  Provide the National Drug Code that the increase or change is based on to the pharmacy or pharmacist; and 4.  Make the change under item 1 of this subparagraph (i) effective for each similarly situated pharmacy as defined by the payor subject to the maximum allowable cost list; or (ii)  If the appeal is denied, provide the challenging pharmacy or pharmacist the National Drug Code and the name of the national or regional pharmaceutical wholesalers operating in Mississippi that have the drug currently in stock at a price below the maximum allowable cost as listed on the maximum allowable cost list; or (iii)  If the National Drug Code provided by the pharmacy benefit manager is not available below the pharmacy acquisition cost from the pharmaceutical wholesaler from whom the pharmacy or pharmacist purchases the majority of prescription drugs for resale, then the pharmacy benefit manager shall adjust the maximum allowable cost as listed on the maximum allowable cost list above the challenging pharmacy's pharmacy acquisition cost and permit the pharmacy to reverse and rebill each claim affected by the inability to procure the drug at a cost that is equal to or less than the previously challenged maximum allowable cost. (5)  (a)  A pharmacy benefit manager shall not reimburse a pharmacy or pharmacist in the state an amount less than the amount that the pharmacy benefit manager reimburses a pharmacy benefit manager affiliate for providing the same pharmacist services. (b)  The amount shall be calculated on a per unit basis based on the same brand and generic product identifier or brand and generic code number. SECTION 4.  Section 73-21-157, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 73-21-157.  (1)  Before beginning to do business as a pharmacy benefit manager, a pharmacy benefit manager shall obtain a license to do business from the board.  To obtain a license, the applicant shall submit an application to the board on a form to be prescribed by the board. (2)  Each pharmacy benefit manager providing pharmacy management benefit plans in this state shall file a statement with the board annually by March 1 or within sixty (60) days of the end of its fiscal year if not a calendar year.  The statement shall be verified by at least two (2) principal officers and shall cover the preceding calendar year or the immediately preceding fiscal year of the pharmacy benefit manager. (3)  The statement shall be on forms prescribed by the board and shall include: (a)  A financial statement of the organization, including its balance sheet and income statement for the preceding year; and (b)  Any other information relating to the operations of the pharmacy benefit manager required by the board under this section. (4)  (a)  Any information required to be submitted to the board pursuant to licensure application that is considered proprietary by a pharmacy benefit manager shall be marked as confidential when submitted to the board.  All such information shall not be subject to the provisions of the federal Freedom of Information Act or the Mississippi Public Records Act and shall not be released by the board unless subject to an order from a court of competent jurisdiction.  The board shall destroy or delete or cause to be destroyed or deleted all such information thirty (30) days after the board determines that the information is no longer necessary or useful. (b)  Any person who knowingly releases, causes to be released or assists in the release of any such information shall be subject to a monetary penalty imposed by the board in an amount not exceeding Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per violation.  When the board is considering the imposition of any penalty under this paragraph (b), it shall follow the same policies and procedures provided for the imposition of other sanctions in the Pharmacy Practice Act.  Any penalty collected under this paragraph (b) shall be deposited into the special fund of the board and used to support the operations of the board relating to the regulation of pharmacy benefit managers. (c)  All employees of the board who have access to the information described in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be fingerprinted, and the board shall submit a set of fingerprints for each employee to the Department of Public Safety for the purpose of conducting a criminal history records check.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the Department of Public Safety shall forward the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history records check. (5)  If the pharmacy benefit manager is audited annually by an independent certified public accountant, a copy of the certified audit report shall be filed annually with the board by June 30 or within thirty (30) days of the report being final. (6)  The board may extend the time prescribed for any pharmacy benefit manager for filing annual statements or other reports or exhibits of any kind for good cause shown. However, the board shall not extend the time for filing annual statements beyond sixty (60) days after the time prescribed by subsection (1) of this section.  The board may waive the requirements for filing financial information for the pharmacy benefit manager if an affiliate of the pharmacy benefit manager is already required to file such information under current law with the Commissioner of Insurance and allow the pharmacy benefit manager to file a copy of documents containing such information with the board in lieu of the statement required by this section. (7)  The expense of administering this section shall be assessed annually by the board against all pharmacy benefit managers operating in this state. (8)  A pharmacy benefit manager or third-party payor may not require pharmacy accreditation standards or recertification requirements inconsistent with, more stringent than, or in addition to federal and state requirements for licensure as a pharmacy in this state. SECTION 5.  Section 73-21-159, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 73-21-159.  (1)  In lieu of or in addition to making its own financial examination of a pharmacy benefit manager, the board may accept the report of a financial examination of other persons responsible for the pharmacy benefit manager under the laws of another state certified by the applicable official of such other state. (2)  The board shall coordinate financial examinations of a pharmacy benefit manager that provides pharmacy management benefit plans in this state to ensure an appropriate level of regulatory oversight and to avoid any undue duplication of effort or regulation.  The pharmacy benefit manager being examined shall pay the cost of the examination.  The cost of the examination shall be deposited in a special fund that shall provide all expenses for the licensing, supervision and examination of all pharmacy benefit managers subject to regulation under Sections 73-21-71 through 73-21-129 and Sections 73-21-151 through 73-21-163. (3)  The board may provide a copy of the financial examination to the person or entity who provides or operates the health insurance plan or to a pharmacist or pharmacy. (4)  The board is authorized to hire independent financial consultants to conduct financial examinations of a pharmacy benefit manager and to expend funds collected under this section to pay the costs of such examinations. SECTION 6.  Section 73-21-161, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 73-21-161.  (1)  As used in this section, the term "referral" means: (a)  Ordering of a patient to a pharmacy by a pharmacy benefit manager affiliate either orally or in writing, including online messaging; (b)  Offering or implementing plan designs that require patients to use affiliated pharmacies; or (c)  Patient or prospective patient specific advertising, marketing, or promotion of a pharmacy by an affiliate. The term "referral" does not include a pharmacy's inclusion by a pharmacy benefit manager affiliate in communications to patients, including patient and prospective patient specific communications, regarding network pharmacies and prices, provided that the affiliate includes information regarding eligible nonaffiliate pharmacies in those communications and the information provided is accurate. (2)  A pharmacy, pharmacy benefit manager, or pharmacy benefit manager affiliate licensed or operating in Mississippi shall be prohibited from: (a)  Making referrals; (b)  Transferring or sharing records relative to prescription information containing patient identifiable and prescriber identifiable data to or from a pharmacy benefit manager affiliate for any commercial purpose; however, nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the exchange of prescription information between a pharmacy and its affiliate for the limited purposes of pharmacy reimbursement; formulary compliance; pharmacy care; public health activities otherwise authorized by law; or utilization review by a health care provider; or (c)  Presenting a claim for payment to any individual, third-party payor, affiliate, or other entity for a service furnished pursuant to a referral from an affiliate. (3)  This section shall not be construed to prohibit a pharmacy from entering into an agreement with a pharmacy benefit manager affiliate to provide pharmacy care to patients, provided that the pharmacy does not receive referrals in violation of subsection (2) of this section and the pharmacy provides the disclosures required in subsection (1) of this section. (4)  If a pharmacy licensed or holding a nonresident pharmacy permit in this state has an affiliate, it shall annually file with the board a disclosure statement identifying all such affiliates. (5)  In addition to any other remedy provided by law, a violation of this section by a pharmacy shall be grounds for disciplinary action by the board under its authority granted in this chapter. (6)  A pharmacist who fills a prescription that violates subsection (2) of this section shall not be liable under this section. SECTION 7.  Section 73-21-163, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 73-21-163.  (1)  Whenever the board has reason to believe that a pharmacy benefit manager or pharmacy benefit manager affiliate is using, has used, or is about to use any method, act or practice prohibited in Sections 73-21-151 through 73-21-163 and that proceedings would be in the public interest, it may bring an action in the name of the board against the pharmacy benefit manager or pharmacy benefit manager affiliate to restrain by temporary or permanent injunction the use of such method, act or practice.  The action shall be brought in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi.  The court is authorized to issue temporary or permanent injunctions to restrain and prevent violations of Sections 73-21-151 through 73-21-163 and such injunctions shall be issued without bond. (2)  The board may impose a monetary penalty on a pharmacy benefit manager or a pharmacy benefit manager affiliate for noncompliance with the provisions of the Sections 73-21-151 through 73-21-163, in amounts of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per violation and not more than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) per violation.  Each day a violation continues for the same brand or generic product identifier or brand or generic code number is a separate violation. The board shall prepare a record entered upon its minutes that states the basic facts upon which the monetary penalty was imposed.  Any penalty collected under this subsection (2) shall be deposited into the special fund of the board. (3)  The board may assess a monetary penalty for those reasonable costs that are expended by the board in the investigation and conduct of a proceeding if the board imposes a monetary penalty under subsection (2) of this section.  A monetary penalty assessed and levied under this section shall be paid to the board by the licensee, registrant or permit holder upon the expiration of the period allowed for appeal of those penalties under Section 73-21-101, or may be paid sooner if the licensee, registrant or permit holder elects.  Any penalty collected by the board under this subsection (3) shall be deposited into the special fund of the board. (4)  When payment of a monetary penalty assessed and levied by the board against a licensee, registrant or permit holder in accordance with this section is not paid by the licensee, registrant or permit holder when due under this section, the board shall have the power to institute and maintain proceedings in its name for enforcement of payment in the chancery court of the county and judicial district of residence of the licensee, registrant or permit holder, or if the licensee, registrant or permit holder is a nonresident of the State of Mississippi, in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi.  When those proceedings are instituted, the board shall certify the record of its proceedings, together with all documents and evidence, to the chancery court and the matter shall be heard in due course by the court, which shall review the record and make its determination thereon in accordance with the provisions of Section 73-21-101.  The hearing on the matter may, in the discretion of the chancellor, be tried in vacation. (5)  The board shall develop and implement a uniform penalty policy that sets the minimum and maximum penalty for any given violation of Sections 73-21-151 through 73-21-163.  The board shall adhere to its uniform penalty policy except in those cases where the board specifically finds, by majority vote, that a penalty in excess of, or less than, the uniform penalty is appropriate.  That vote shall be reflected in the minutes of the board and shall not be imposed unless it appears as having been adopted by the board. SECTION 8.  Section 83-18-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-18-1.  As used in this chapter unless the context otherwise requires: (a)  "Administrator" or "third-party administrator" or "TPA" means a person who directly or indirectly solicits or effects coverage of, underwrites, collects charges or premiums from, or adjusts or settles claims on residents of this state, or residents of another state from offices in this state, in connection with life or health insurance coverage or annuities, except any of the following: (i)  An employer on behalf of its employees or the employees of one or more subsidiaries or affiliated corporations of such employer; (ii)  A union on behalf of its members; (iii)  An insurer which is authorized to transact insurance in this state with respect to a policy lawfully issued and delivered in and pursuant to the laws of this state or another state; (iv)  An agent or broker licensed to sell life or health insurance in this state, whose activities are limited exclusively to the sale of insurance; (v)  A creditor on behalf of its debtors with respect to insurance covering a debt between the creditor and its debtors; (vi)  A trust and its trustees, agents and employees acting pursuant to such trust established in conformity with 29 USC Section 186; (vii)  A trust exempt from taxation under Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, its trustees and employees acting pursuant to such trust, or a custodian and the custodian's agents or employees acting pursuant to a custodian account which meets the requirements of Section 401(f) of the Internal Revenue Code; (viii)  A credit union or a financial institution which is subject to supervision or examination by federal or state banking authorities, or a mortgage lender, to the extent they collect and remit premiums to licensed insurance agents or authorized insurers in connection with loan payments; (ix)  A credit card issuing company which advances for and collects premiums or charges from its credit card holders who have authorized collection if the company does not adjust or settle claims; (x)  A person who adjusts or settles claims in the normal course of that person's practice or employment as an attorney at law and who does not collect charges or premiums in connection with life or health insurance coverage or annuities; (xi)  An adjuster licensed by this state whose activities are limited to adjustment of claims; (xii)  A person who acts solely as an administrator of one or more bona fide employee benefit plans established by an employer or an employee organization; or (xiii)  A person licensed as a managing general agent in this state, whose activities are limited exclusively to the scope of activities conveyed under such license. (b)  "Affiliate" or "affiliated" means any entity or person who directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls or is controlled by, or is under common control with, a specified entity or person. (c)  "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Insurance. (d)  "Insurance" or "insurance coverage" means any coverage offered or provided by an insurer. (e)  "Insurer" means any person undertaking to provide life or health insurance coverage in this state.  For the purposes of this chapter, insurer includes a licensed insurance company, a prepaid hospital or medical care plan, a health maintenance organization, a multiple employer welfare arrangement, or any other person providing a plan of insurance subject to state insurance regulation. Insurer does not include a bona fide employee benefit plan established by an employer or an employee organization, or both, for which the insurance laws of this state are preempted pursuant to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974. (f)  "Underwrites" or "underwriting" means, but is not limited to, the acceptance of employer or individual applications for coverage of individuals in accordance with the written rules of the insurer; the overall planning and coordinating of an insurance program; and the ability to procure bonds and excess insurance. SECTION 9.  Section 83-18-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-18-3.  (1)  No person shall act as or hold himself out to be an administrator in this state, other than an adjuster licensed in this state for the kinds of business for which he is acting as an adjuster, unless he shall hold a license as an administrator issued by the Mississippi Commissioner of Insurance.  Failure to hold such a license shall subject the administrator to a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).  Such license shall be issued by the commissioner to an administrator unless the commissioner, after due notice and hearing, shall have determined that the administrator is not competent, trustworthy, financially responsible or of good personal and business reputation or has had a previous application for an insurance license denied for cause within five (5) years. (2)  All applications shall be accompanied by a fee of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00).  The license is renewable annually on the date of issue.  A request for renewal must be accompanied by a renewal fee of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).  Prior to the issuance or renewal of the license of any administrator, a fidelity bond in a form and amount as determined by the commissioner shall be obtained by the licensee. (3)  After notice and hearing, the commissioner may revoke a license or fine an administrator not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or both, or the commissioner may suspend such license or fine such administrator not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or both, upon finding that either the administrator violated any of the requirements of this chapter or the administrator is not competent, trustworthy, financially responsible or of good personal and business reputation. (4)  The Commissioner of Insurance may promulgate rules and regulations which are necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter. (5)  In addition to the reasons specified in this section, the commissioner shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  Actions taken by the board in suspending a license when required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 are not actions from which an appeal may be taken under this section.  Any appeal of a license suspension that is required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 shall be taken in accordance with the appeal procedure specified in Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, rather than the procedure specified in this section.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (6)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the Social Security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 10.  Section 83-18-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-18-5.  (1)  No administrator shall act as such without a written agreement between the administrator and the insurer or employer, and such written agreement shall be retained as part of the official records of both the insurer or employer and the administrator for the duration of the agreement and for five (5) years thereafter. The agreement shall contain all provisions required by this statute, except insofar as those requirements do not apply to the functions performed by the administrator. (2)  The written agreement shall include a statement of duties which the administrator is expected to perform on behalf of the insurer or employer and the lines, classes or types of insurance for which the administrator is to be authorized to administer. The agreement shall make provision with respect to underwriting or other standards pertaining to the business underwritten by such insurer. (3)  The insurer, employer or administrator may, with written notice, terminate the written agreement for cause as provided in the agreement. The insurer may suspend the underwriting authority of the administrator during the pendency of any dispute regarding the cause for termination of the written agreement. The insurer must fulfill any lawful obligations with respect to policies affected by the written agreement, regardless of any dispute between the insurer and the administrator. SECTION 11.  Section 83-18-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-18-7.  If an insurer utilizes the services of an administrator, the payment to the administrator of any premiums or charges for insurance by or on behalf of the insured party shall be deemed to have been received by the insurer, and the payment of return premiums or claim payments forwarded by the insurer to the administrator shall not be deemed to have been paid to the insured party or claimant until such payments are received by the insured party or claimant. Nothing in this section limits any right of the insurer against the administrator resulting from the failure of the administrator to make payments to the insurer, insured parties or claimants. SECTION 12.  Section 83-18-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-18-9.  (1)  Every administrator shall maintain and make available to the insurer or employer complete books and records of all transactions performed on behalf of the insurer or employer. The books and records shall be maintained in accordance with prudent standards of insurance record keeping and must be maintained for a period of not less than five (5) years from the date of their creation. (2)  The commissioner shall have access to books and records maintained by an administrator for the purposes of examination, audit and inspection. Any trade secrets contained in such books and records, including the identity and addresses of policyholders and certificate holders, shall be kept confidential, except that the commissioner may use such information in any proceeding instituted against the administrator. (3)  The insurer or employer shall own the records generated by the administrator pertaining to the insurer; however, the administrator shall retain the right to continuing access to books and records to permit the administrator to fulfill all of its contractual obligations to insured parties, claimants, and the insurer. (4)  In the event the insurer or employer and the administrator cancel their agreement, notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the administrator may, by written agreement with the insurer or employer, transfer all records to a new administrator rather than retain them for five (5) years. In such cases, the new administrator shall acknowledge, in writing, that it is responsible for retaining the records of the prior administrator as required in subsection (1) of this section. SECTION 13.  Section 83-18-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-18-11.  An administrator may use only such advertising pertaining to the business underwritten by an insurer as has been approved in writing by the insurer in advance of its use. SECTION 14.  Section 83-18-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-18-13.  (1)  If an insurer utilizes the services of an administrator, the insurer shall be responsible for determining the benefits, premium rates, underwriting criteria and claims payment procedures applicable to such coverage and for securing reinsurance, if any. The rules pertaining to these matters must be provided, in writing, by the insurer to the administrator. The responsibilities of the administrator as to any of these matters shall be set forth in the written agreement between the administrator and the insurer. (2)  It is the sole responsibility of the insurer or employer to provide for competent administration of its programs. (3)  In cases where an administrator benefits for more than one hundred (100) certificate holders on behalf of an insurer, the insurer shall, at least semiannually, conduct a review of the operations of the administrator. At least one (1) such review shall be an on-site audit of the operations of the administrator. SECTION 15.  Section 83-18-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-18-15.  (1)  All insurance charges or premiums collected by an administrator on behalf of or for an insurer or insurers, and the return of premiums received from that insurer or insurers, shall be held by the administrator in a fiduciary capacity. Such funds shall be immediately remitted to the person or persons entitled to them or shall be deposited promptly in a fiduciary account established and maintained by the administrator in a federally insured financial institution. The written agreement between the administrator and the insurer shall provide for the administrator to periodically render an accounting to the insurer detailing all transactions performed by the administrator pertaining to the business underwritten by the insurer. (2)  If charges or premiums deposited in a fiduciary account have been collected on behalf of or for one or more insurers, the administrator shall keep records clearly recording the deposits in and withdrawals from the account on behalf of each insurer. The administrator shall keep copies of all the records, and upon request of an insurer, shall furnish the insurer with copies of the records pertaining to such deposits and withdrawals. (3)  The administrator shall not pay any claim by withdrawals from a fiduciary account in which premiums or charges are deposited. Withdrawals from such account shall be made as provided in the written agreement between the administrator and the insurer. The written agreement shall address, but not be limited to, the following: (a)  Remittance to an insurer entitled to remittance; (b)  Deposit in an account maintained in the name of the insurer; (c)  Transfer to and deposit in a claims-paying account, with claims to be paid as provided in subsection (4); (d)  Payment to a group policyholder for remittance to the insurer entitled to such remittance; (e)  Payment to the administrator of its commissions, fees or charges; and (f)  Remittance of return premium to the person or persons entitled to such return premium. (4)  All claims paid by the administrator from funds collected on behalf of or for an insurer shall be paid only on drafts or checks of and as authorized by the insurer. SECTION 16.  Section 83-18-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-18-17.  (1)  An administrator shall not enter into any agreement or understanding with an insurer in which the effect is to make the amount of the administrator's commissions, fees or charges contingent upon savings effected in the adjustment, settlement and payment of losses covered by the insurer's obligations. This provision shall not prohibit an administrator from receiving performance-based compensation for providing hospital or other auditing services. (2)  This section shall not prevent the compensation of an administrator from being based on premiums or charges collected or the number of claims paid or processed. SECTION 17.  Section 83-18-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-18-19.  (1)  When the services of an administrator are utilized, the administrator shall provide a written notice approved by the insurer to covered individuals advising them of the identity of, and relationship among, the administrator, the policyholder and the insurer. (2)  When an administrator collects funds, the reason for collection of each item must be identified to the insured party and each item must be shown separately from any premium. Additional charges may not be made for services to the extent the services have been paid for by the insurer. (3)  The administrator shall disclose to the insurer or employer all charges, fees and commissions received from all services in connection with the provision of administrative services for the insurer, including any fees or commissions paid by insurers providing reinsurance. SECTION 18.  Section 83-18-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-18-21.  Any policies, certificates, booklets, termination notices or other written communications delivered by the insurer to the administrator for delivery to insured parties or covered individuals shall be delivered by the administrator promptly after receipt of instructions from the insurer to deliver them. SECTION 19.  Section 83-18-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-18-23.  (1)  No person shall act as, or offer to act as, or hold himself out to be an administrator in this state without a valid certificate of authority as an administrator issued by the commissioner. (2)  Applicants to be an administrator shall make an application to the commissioner upon a form to be furnished by the commissioner. The application shall include or be accompanied by the following information and documents: (a)  All basic organizational documents of the administrator, including any articles of incorporation, articles of association, partnership agreement, trade name certificate, trust agreement, shareholder agreement and other applicable documents and all amendments to such documents; (b)  The bylaws, rules, regulations or similar documents regulating the internal affairs of the administrator; (c)  The names, addresses, official positions and professional qualifications of the individuals who are responsible for the conduct of affairs of the administrator; including all members of the board of directors, board of trustees, executive committee or other governing board or committee; the principal officers in the case of a corporation or the partners or members in the case of a partnership or association; shareholders holding directly or indirectly ten percent (10%) or more of the voting securities of the administrator; and any other person who exercises control or influence over the affairs of the administrator; (d)  Annual financial statements or reports for the two (2) most recent years which prove that the applicant is solvent and such information as the commissioner may require in order to review the current financial condition of the applicant; (e)  A statement describing the business plan including information on staffing levels and activities proposed in this state and nationwide. The plan must provide details setting forth the administrator's capability for providing a sufficient number of experienced and qualified personnel in the areas of claims processing, record keeping and underwriting; (f)  If the applicant will be managing the solicitation of new or renewal business, proof that it employs or has contracted with an agent licensed by this state for solicitation and taking of applications. Any applicant which intends to directly solicit insurance contracts or to otherwise act as an insurance agent must provide proof that it has a license as an insurance agent in this state; (g)  Such other pertinent information as may be required by the commissioner. (3)  The applicant shall make available for inspection by the commissioner copies of all contracts with insurers or other persons utilizing the services of the administrator. (4)  The commissioner may refuse to issue a certificate of authority if the commissioner determines that the administrator, or any individual responsible for the conduct of affairs of the administrator as defined in subsection (2)(c) of this section, is not competent, trustworthy, financially responsible or of good personal and business reputation, or has had an insurance or an administrator license denied or revoked for cause by any state. (5)  A certificate of authority issued under this section shall remain valid, unless surrendered, suspended or revoked by the commissioner, for so long as the administrator continues in business in this state and remains in compliance with this chapter. (6)  An administrator is not required to hold a certificate of authority as an administrator in this state if all of the following conditions are met: (a)  The administrator is not soliciting business as an administrator in this state; (b)  In the case of any group policy or plan of insurance serviced by the administrator, the lesser of five percent (5%) or one hundred (100) certificate holders reside in this state. (7)  An administrator shall immediately notify the commissioner of any material change in its ownership, control or other fact or circumstance affecting its qualification for a certificate of authority in this state. (8)  No bonding shall be required by the commissioner of any administrator whose business is restricted solely to benefit plans which are either fully insured by an authorized insurer or which are bona fide employee benefit plans established by an employer or any employee organization, or both, for which the insurance laws of this state are preempted pursuant to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974. SECTION 20.  Section 83-18-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-18-25.  Upon request from an administrator, the commissioner may waive the application requirements of subsection (2) of Section 83-18-23 if the administrator has a valid certificate of authority as an administrator issued in a state which has standards for administrators that are at least as stringent as those contained in the model statute for third-party administrators of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. SECTION 21.  Section 83-18-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-18-27.  (1)  Each administrator shall file an annual report for the preceding calendar year with the commissioner on or before March 1 of each year, or within such extension of time therefor as the commissioner for good cause may grant. The report shall be in the form and contain such matters as the commissioner prescribes and shall be verified by at least two (2) officers of the administrator. (2)  The annual report shall include the complete names and addresses of all insurers with which the administrator had an agreement during the preceding fiscal year. (3)  At the time of filing its annual report, the administrator shall pay a filing fee as required by the commissioner. SECTION 22.  Section 83-18-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-18-29.  (1)  The certificate of authority of an administrator shall be suspended or revoked if the commissioner finds that the administrator: (a)  Is in an unsound financial condition; (b)  Is using such methods or practices in the conduct of its business so as to render its further transaction of business in this state hazardous or injurious to insured persons or the public; or (c)  Has failed to pay any judgment rendered against it in this state within sixty (60) days after the judgment has become final. (2)  The commissioner may, in his or her discretion, suspend or revoke the certificate of authority of an administrator if the commissioner finds that the administrator: (a)  Has violated any lawful rule or order of the commissioner or any provision of the insurance laws of this state; (b)  Has refused to be examined or to produce its accounts, records and files for examination, or if any of its officers has refused to give information with respect to its affairs or has refused to perform any other legal obligation as to such examination, when required by the commissioner; (c)  Has, without just cause, refused to pay proper claims or perform services arising under its contracts or has, without just cause, caused covered individuals to accept less than the amount due them or caused covered individuals to employ attorneys or bring suit against the administrator to secure full payment or settlement of such claims; (d)  Is affiliated with or under the same general management or interlocking directorate or ownership as another administrator or insurer which unlawfully transacts business in this state without having a certificate of authority; (e)  At any time fails to meet any qualification for which issuance of the certificate could have been refused had such failure then existed and been known to the department; (f)  Has been convicted of, or has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony without regard to whether adjudication was withheld; or (g)  Is under suspension or revocation in another state. (3)  The commissioner may, in his or her discretion and without advance notice or hearing thereon, immediately suspend the certificate of any administrator if the commissioner finds that one or more of the following circumstances exist: (a)  The administrator is insolvent or impaired; (b)  A proceeding for receivership, conservatorship, rehabilitation or other delinquency proceeding regarding the administrator has been commenced in any state; (c)  The financial condition or business practices of the administrator otherwise pose an imminent threat to the public health, safety or welfare of the residents of this state. (4)  If the commissioner finds that one or more grounds exist for the suspension or revocation of a certificate of authority issued under this chapter, the commissioner may, in lieu of such suspension or revocation, impose a fine upon the administrator. SECTION 23.  Section 83-18-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-18-101. Sections 83-18-101 through 83-18-111 may be cited as the Managing General Agents Act. SECTION 24.  Section 83-18-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-18-103.  As used in Sections 83-18-101 through 83-18-111: (a)  "Actuary" means a person who is a member in good standing of the American Academy of Actuaries. (b)  "Insurer" means any person, firm, association or corporation duly licensed in this state as an insurance company as defined in Section 83-5-1, Mississippi Code of 1972. (c)  "Managing general agent" means any person, firm, association or corporation who negotiates and binds ceding reinsurance contracts on behalf of an insurer or manages all or part of the insurance business of an insurer (including the management of a separate division, department or underwriting office) and acts as an agent for such insurer whether known as a managing general agent, manager or other similar term, who, with or without the authority, either separately or together with affiliates, produces, directly or indirectly, and underwrites an amount of gross direct written premium equal to or more than five percent (5%) of the policyholder surplus as reported in the last annual statement of the insurer in any one (1) quarter or year together with one or more of the following: (i) adjusts or pays claims in excess of an amount determined by the commissioner; or (ii) negotiates reinsurance on behalf of the insurer. Notwithstanding the above, the following persons shall not be considered as a managing general agent for the purposes of Sections 83-18-101 through 83-18-111: (i)  An employee of the insurer; (ii)  A United States manager of the United States branch of an alien insurer; (iii)  An underwriting manager which, pursuant to contract, manages all the insurance operations of the insurer, is under common control with the insurer, subject to the holding company regulatory act, and whose compensation is not based on the volume of premiums written; or (iv)  The attorney-in-fact authorized by and acting for the subscribers of a reciprocal insurer or interinsurance exchange under powers of attorney. (d)  "Underwrite" means the authority to accept or reject risk on behalf of the insurer. SECTION 25.  Section 83-18-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-18-105.  (1)  No person, firm, association or corporation shall act in the capacity of a managing general agent with respect to risks located in this state for an insurer licensed in this state unless such person is a licensed producer in this state. (2)  No person, firm, association or corporation shall act in the capacity of a managing general agent representing an insurer domiciled in this state with respect to risks located outside this state unless such person is licensed as a producer in this state (such license may be a nonresident license) under Sections 83-18-101 through 83-18-111. (3)  The commissioner may require a bond in an amount acceptable to him for the protection of the insurer. The commissioner may require the managing general agent to maintain an errors and omissions policy. (4)  The commissioner may adopt reasonable rules and regulations to implement Sections 83-18-101 through 83-18-111. SECTION 26.  Section 83-18-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-18-107.  (1)  No person, firm, association or corporation acting in the capacity of a managing general agent shall place business with an insurer unless there is in force a written contract between the parties which sets forth the responsibilities of each party and where both parties share responsibility for a particular function, specifies the division of such responsibilities and which contains the following minimum provisions: (a)  The insurer may terminate the contract for cause upon written notice to the managing general agent. The insurer may suspend the underwriting authority of the managing general agent during the pendency of any dispute regarding the cause for termination. (b)  The managing general agent will render accounts to the insurer detailing all transactions and remit all funds due under the contract to the insurer on not less than a monthly basis. (c)  All funds collected for the account of an insurer will be held by the managing general agent in a fiduciary capacity in a bank which is a member of the Federal Reserve System. This account shall be used for all payments on behalf of the insurer. The managing general agent may retain no more than three (3) months estimated claims payments and allocated loss adjustment expenses. (d)  Separate records of business written by the managing general agent shall be maintained. The insurer shall have access and right to copy all accounts and records related to its business in a form usable by the insurer and the commissioner shall have access to all books, bank accounts and records of the managing general agent in a form usable to the commissioner. (e)  The contract may not be assigned in whole or part by the managing general agent. (f)  Appropriate underwriting guidelines including: (i)  The maximum annual premium volume; (ii)  The basis of the rates to be charged; (iii)  The types of risks which may be written; (iv)  Maximum limits of liability; (v)  Applicable exclusions; (vi)  Territorial limitations; (vii)  Policy cancellation provisions; and (viii)  The maximum policy period. The insurer shall have the right to cancel or nonrenew any policy of insurance subject to the applicable laws and regulations. (g)  If the contract permits the managing general agent to settle claims on behalf of the insurer: (i)  All claims must be reported to the company in a timely manner. (ii)  A copy of the claim file shall be sent to the insurer at its request or as soon as it becomes known that the claim: (A)  Has the potential to exceed an amount determined by the commissioner or exceeds the limit set by the company, whichever is less; (B)  Involves a coverage dispute; (C)  May exceed the managing general agent's claims settlement authority; (D)  Is open for more than six (6) months; or (E)  Is closed by payment of an amount set by the commissioner or an amount set by the company, whichever is less. (h)  Where electronic claims files are in existence, the contract must address the timely transmission of the data. (2)  All claim files shall be the joint property of the insurer and managing general agent. However, upon an order of liquidation of the insurer such files shall become the sole property of the insurer or its estate; the managing general agent shall have reasonable access to and the right to copy the files on a timely basis. (3)  Any settlement authority granted to the managing general agent may be terminated for cause upon the insurer's written notice to the managing general agent or upon the termination of the contract. The insurer may suspend the settlement authority during the pendency of any dispute regarding the cause for termination. (4)  If the contract provides for a sharing of interim profits by the managing general agent, and the managing general agent has the authority to determine the amount of the interim profits by establishing loss reserves or controlling claim payments, or in any other manner, interim profits shall not be paid to the managing general agent until one (1) year after they are earned for property insurance business and five (5) years after they are earned on casualty business and not until the profits have been verified pursuant to Section 83-18-109. (5)  The managing general agent shall not: (a)  Bind reinsurance or retrocessions on behalf of the insurer, except that the managing general agent may bind facultative reinsurance contracts pursuant to obligatory facultative agreements if the contract with the insurer contains reinsurance underwriting guidelines including, for both reinsurance assumed and ceded, a list of reinsurers with which such automatic agreements are in effect, the coverages and amounts or percentages that may be reinsured and commission schedules; (b)  Commit the insurer to participate in insurance or reinsurance syndicates; (c)  Appoint any producer without assuring that the producer is lawfully licensed to transact the type of insurance for which he is appointed; (d)  Without prior approval of the insurer, pay or commit the insurer to pay a claim over a specified amount, net of reinsurance, which shall not exceed one percent (1%) of the insurer's policyholder's surplus as of December 31 of the last completed calendar year; (e)  Collect any payment from a reinsurer or commit the insurer to any claim settlement with a reinsurer without prior approval of the insurer. If prior approval is given, a report must be promptly forwarded to the insurer; (f)  Permit its subproducer to serve on the insurer's board of directors; (g)  Jointly employ an individual who is employed with the insurer; or (h)  Appoint a submanaging general agent. SECTION 27.  Section 83-18-109, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-18-109.  (1)  The insurer shall have on file an independent financial examination, in a form acceptable to the commissioner, of each managing general agent with which it has done business. (2)  If a managing general agent establishes loss reserves, the insurer shall annually obtain the opinion of an actuary attesting to the adequacy of loss reserves established for losses incurred and outstanding on business produced by the managing general agent. This is in addition to any other required loss reserve certification. (3)  The insurer shall periodically (at least semiannually) conduct an on-site review of the underwriting and claims processing operations of the managing general agent. (4)  Binding authority for all reinsurance contracts or participation in insurance or reinsurance syndicates shall rest with an officer of the insurer, who shall not be affiliated with the managing general agent. (5)  Within thirty (30) days of entering into or termination of a contract with a managing general agent, the insurer shall provide written notification of such appointment or termination to the commissioner. Notices of appointment of a managing general agent shall include a statement of duties which the applicant is expected to perform on behalf of the insurer, the lines of insurance for which the applicant is to be authorized to act and any other information the commissioner may request. (6)  An insurer shall review its books and records each quarter to determine if any producer as defined by Section 83-18-103 has become, by operation of Section 83-18-103, a managing general agent as defined in that section. If the insurer determines that a producer has become a managing general agent pursuant to the above, the insurer shall promptly notify the producer and the commissioner of such determination and the insurer and producer must fully comply with the provisions of Sections 83-18-101 and 83-18-111 within thirty (30) days. (7)  An insurer shall not appoint to its board of directors an officer, director, employee, subproducer or controlling shareholder of its managing general agent. This subsection shall not apply to relationships governed by the Insurance Holding Company Act or, if applicable, the Broker Controlled Insurer Act. (8)  The acts of the managing general agent are considered to be the acts of the insurer on whose behalf it is acting. A managing general agent may be examined as if it were the insurer. SECTION 28.  Section 83-18-111, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-18-111.  (1)  If the commissioner finds after a hearing conducted in accordance with Section 83-6-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, that any person has violated Sections 83-18-101 through 83-18-111, the commissioner may order: (a)  For each separate violation, a penalty in an amount not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00); (b)  Revocation or suspension of the producer's license; and (c)  The managing general agent to reimburse the insurer, the rehabilitator or liquidator of the insurer for any losses incurred by the insurer caused by a violation of Sections 83-18-101 through 83-18-111 committed by the managing general agent. (2)  The decision, determination or order of the commissioner pursuant to subsection (1) shall be subject to judicial review pursuant to Section 83-6-41, Mississippi Code of 1972. (3)  Nothing contained in this section shall affect the right of the commissioner to impose any other penalties provided for in the insurance law. (4)  Nothing contained in Sections 83-18-101 through 83-18-111 is intended to or shall in any manner limit or restrict the rights of policyholders, claimants and auditors. SECTION 29.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.